Washington statutes.
RCW 19.72.030

Individual sureties—Number—Qualification.

Each of such sureties shall have separate property worth the amount specified in the bond or recognizance, over and above all debts and liabilities, and exclusive of property exempt from execution, unless the other spouse joins in the execution of the bond, in which case they must have community property of such required value; but in case such bond or recognizance is given in any action or proceeding commenced or pending in any court the judge, on justification, may allow more than two sureties to justify, severally, in amounts less than the amount specified, if the whole justification is equivalent to that of two sufficient sureties.

[ 1987 c 202 s 185; 1973 1st ex.s. c 154 s 22; 1927 c 162 s 2; RRS s 958-2.]

NOTES:

Intent—1987 c 202: See note following RCW 2.04.190.

Severability—1973 1st ex.s. c 154: See note following RCW 2.12.030.